Utah statutes.
63A-9-808.   Personal handheld electronic device -- Rulemaking on giving
priority to state and local agencies in purchasing surplus property --
Rulemaking on the sale or use of a personal handheld electronic device.
(1)  As used in this section, "personal handheld electronic device":
(a)  means an electronic device that is designed for handheld use and permits
the user to store or access information, the primary value of which is
specific to the user of the device; and
(b)  includes a mobile phone, pocket personal computer, personal digital
assistant, wireless, or similar device.
(2)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the division shall make rules:
(a)  giving state and local agencies priority to purchase surplus property for
a 30-day period except for personal handheld electronic devices under
Subsection (2)(b); and
(b)  allowing the sale of a personal handheld electronic device to a user who:
(i)  is provided the device as part of the user's employment; and
(ii)  subsequently makes a change in employment status including, departure,
retirement, or transfer to another agency within state government.
